Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 12 Fish Cultivation

20-12-1.
Cultivation of inland fish.

The department of environmental management shall be empowered to introduce, protect, and cultivate fish in the inland waters of the state, and to construct, maintain, and operate fish cultivation and breeding facilities and undertake fish cultivation projects within the state as may be, in the opinion of the director, appropriate. The director may take fish from the fisheries of the state for any purpose connected with fish culture or for scientific observation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-12-2.
Acquisition of land for fish cultivation.

For the purpose of protecting and propagating fish and providing fishing preserves, the director of environmental management may, in the name and for the use of the state, and subject to approval of the state properties committee, acquire, by gift, lease, or purchase, land, freshwater streams, lakes, or ponds, or any part thereof or rights and interests therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-12-3.
Freshwater hatcheries.

The department of environmental management shall establish and maintain freshwater hatcheries in this state for the purpose of providing freshwater and anadromous game fish to be used by the department in the stocking of the ponds and streams of the state. All of the output of those hatcheries not so used shall be sold at a fair-market price and for cash only, and the money received shall be turned in to the general treasury for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-12-4.
Fishways.

For the purpose of providing for the passage of anadromous fish species to their traditional spawning grounds in freshwater, the department of environmental management is authorized and directed to construct fishways around or through existing dams in the rivers and streams of this state. The owners of those dams shall cooperate with the department of environmental management and shall not be liable for any damage as the result of the construction of the fishways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-12-5.
Fishing prohibited in or near waters set aside.

No person shall catch, or attempt to catch, any fish, or use any seine for catching fish, in waters acquired by the director of environmental management for fish cultivation projects, or within one half (1/2) mile from the mouth or outlet of any fish cultivation project; provided, however, the director may, by regulation adopted pursuant to §

20-1-12

, or by special permit, allow persons to fish at or near a fish cultivation project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-12-6.
Obstructions to fish culture.

The director of environmental management may seize, and remove summarily if need be, all obstructions erected to hinder the passage of fish or that are illegally erected to obstruct, or in any way impede, the growth and culture of fish; and every person rebuilding or continuing any obstruction after it has been removed and notification has been given by the director, shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-12-7.
Violations as to fish cultivation projects.

No person shall take any fish or fish spawn, or any apparatus used in hatching or protecting fish, from any pond, lake, river, or stream stocked with, or set apart by, the director of environmental management, by any city or town, or by private parties, without the consent of the director, city or town council, or private party, nor shall any person violate any rule or regulation adopted regarding fish cultivation projects.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-12-8.
Annual appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum it may deem necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.